Missouri, session 2026, HB2675.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 630, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 630.1130, to read as follows:
630.1130. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Local public health agency", a county health center board established
under chapter 205, a county health department, a combined city and county health
department or agency, a multicounty health department or agency, or any other county
health authority;
(2) "Mobile mental health unit", a vehicle that travels to various locations in
communities in order to provide services within the vehicle to promote mental health
and public awareness of mental health issues;
(3) "Program", the statewide mobile mental health unit program established in
subsection 3 of this section.
2. The department of mental health shall apply for grant funding from the
United States Department of Health and Human Services to establish mobile mental
health units throughout the state in cooperation with local public health agencies.
3. There is hereby established the "Statewide Mobile Mental Health Unit
Program" within the department of mental health. Upon receipt of any grant moneys
under subsection 2 of this section, the department of mental health shall implement the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2675 2
program by cooperating with local public health agencies to establish mobile mental
health units in communities across the state.
4. Each mobile mental health unit established by the program shall:
(1) Provide information about mental illness and substance use and combat the
stigma associated with mental illness and substance use;
(2) Provide information about behavioral health care services available in the
community and assist individuals in accessing such services;
(3) Assist individuals in scheduling appointments for behavioral health care
services; and
(4) Facilitate public participation in events that promote preventive health
measures.
✔